Washington statutes.
RCW 11.108.060

Marital deduction gift—Survivorship requirement—Limits—Property to be held in trust.

For an estate that exceeds the amount exempt from state or federal tax by virtue of the credit under section 2010 of the Internal Revenue Code, if taking into account applicable adjusted taxable gifts as defined in section 2001(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, any marital deduction gift that is conditioned upon the transferor's spouse surviving the transferor for a period of more than six months, is governed by the following:

(1) A survivorship requirement expressed in the governing instrument in excess of six months or which may exceed six months, other than survival by a spouse of a common disaster resulting in the death of the transferor, does not apply to property passing under the marital deduction gift, and for the gift, the survivorship requirement may not exceed the period ending six months following the transferor's date of death, as established under section 2056(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) If the property that is the subject of the marital deduction gift is passing or is to be held in trust, as opposed to passing outright, it must be held in a trust meeting the requirements of section 2056(b)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code the corpus of which must: (a) Pass as though the spouse failed to survive the transferor if the spouse, in fact, fails to survive the term specified in the governing instrument; and (b) pass to the spouse under the terms of the governing instrument if the spouse, in fact, survives the term specified in the governing instrument.

[ 2006 c 360 s 6; 1999 c 44 s 1; 1997 c 252 s 86; 1989 c 35 s 1; 1985 c 30 s 111. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 145.]

NOTES:

Clarification of laws—Enforceability of act—Severability—2006 c 360: See notes following RCW 11.108.070.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.